Massachusetts, session 194th, H1296.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
1 SECTION XX. Chapter 32A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official
2 Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after section 33, the following new section: -
3 Section 34.
4 (a) For purposes of this section:
5 (1) “340B drug” shall mean a drug that has been subject to any offer for reduced prices
6 by a manufacturer pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 256b and is purchased by a covered entity as defined by
7 42 U.S.C. 256b(a)(4).
8 (2) “340B entity” shall mean an entity participating or authorized to participate in the
9 federal 340B drug discount program, as defined by 42 U.S.C. 256b, including its pharmacy, or
10 any pharmacy contracted with the participating entity to dispense drugs purchased through the
11 340B drug discount program.
1 of 30

12 (3) “Health insurance issuer” shall mean the group insurance commission or a “carrier”
13 as defined in section 1 of chapter 176O.
14 (4) “Third party” shall mean a group health plan, a health insurance issuer offering group
15 or individual health insurance coverage, or a pharmacy benefit manager that reimburses a 340B
16 covered entity for drugs. Third party includes Medicaid managed care organizations, employee
17 benefit plans under the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, or Medicare Part C
18 or D plans. Third party does not include drugs reimbursed under Medicaid fee-for-service or a
19 self-pay patient.
20 (5) “Manufacturer” means a person who is engaged in manufacturing, preparing,
21 propagating, compounding, processing, packaging, repackaging or labeling a prescription drug as
22 defined in 247 CMR 2.00.
23 (6) “Pharmacy” incudes the definition of “pharmacy” and “retail drug business” as
24 defined by section 1 of chapter 94C, and “Institutional pharmacy” as defined by section 39D of
25 chapter 112.
26 (7) “Pharmacy benefit manager” shall have the same meaning as defined by section 226
27 of chapter 175.
28 (b) With respect to reimbursement to a 340B entity for 340B drugs, a health insurance
29 issuer, pharmacy benefit manager, other third party payor, or their agents shall not do any of the
30 following:
2 of 30

31 (i) Reimburse a 340B entity for 340B drugs at a rate lower than that paid for the same
32 drug to entities that are not 340B entities or lower reimbursement for a claim on the basis that the
33 claim is for a 340B drug.
34 (ii) Impose any terms or conditions on any 340B entity with respect to any of the
35 following that differ from such terms or conditions applied to non-340B entities on the basis that
36 the entity participates in the federal 340B drug discount program set forth in 42 U.S.C.256b or
37 that a drug is a 340B drug including, without limitation, any of the following:
38 A. Fees, charges, clawbacks, or other adjustments or assessments. For purposes of this
39 Subsection, the term “other adjustment” includes placing any additional requirements,
40 restrictions, or unnecessary burdens upon the 340B entity that results in administrative costs or
41 fees to the 340B entity that are not placed upon other entities that do not participate in the 340B
42 drug discount program, including affiliate pharmacies of the health insurance issuer, pharmacy
43 benefit manager, or other third-party payor.
44 B. Dispensing fees that are less than the dispensing fees for non-340B entities.
45 C. Restrictions or requirements regarding participation in standard or preferred pharmacy
46 networks.
47 D. Requirements that a claim for a drug include any identification, billing modifier,
48 attestation, or other indication that a drug is a 340B drug in order to be processed or resubmitted
49 unless it is required by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, the executive office of
50 health and human services, or the division of medical assistance.
3 of 30

51 E. Any other restrictions, conditions, practices, or policies that are not imposed on non-
52 340B entities.
53 (iii) Require a 340B entity to reverse, resubmit, or clarify a claim after the initial
54 adjudication unless these actions are in the normal course of pharmacy business and not related
55 to 340B drug pricing.
56 (iv) Discriminate against a 340B entity in a manner that prevents or interferes with any
57 patient’s choice to receive such drugs from the 340B entity, including the administration of such
58 drugs. For purposes of this subsection, it is considered a discriminatory practice that prevents or
59 interferes with a patient’s choice to receive drugs at a 340B entity if a health insurance issuer,
60 pharmacy benefit manager, or other third-party payor places any additional requirements,
61 restrictions, or unnecessary burdens upon the 340B entity that results in administrative costs or
62 fees to the 340B entity, including but not limited to requiring a claim for a drug to include any
63 identification, billing modifier, attestation or other indication that a drug is a 340B drug in order
64 to be processed or resubmitted unless it is required by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
65 Services, the executive office of health and human services, or the division of medical assistance.
66 (v) Require a 340B entity to submit any claims, utilization, patient, or other data as a
67 condition for allowing the acquisition of a 340B drug by, or delivery of a 340B drug to, a 340B
68 entity unless the data is required by the United States Department of Health and Human Services,
69 Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, the executive office of health and human services,
70 or the division of medical assistance.
71 (vi) Include any other provision in a contract between a health insurance issuer, pharmacy
72 benefit manager, or other third-party payor and a 340B entity that discriminates against the 340B
4 of 30

73 entity or prevents or interferes with an individual’s choice to receive a prescription drug from a
74 340B entity, including the administration of the drug, in person or via direct delivery, mail, or
75 other form of shipment, or creation of a restriction or additional charge on a patient who chooses
76 to receive drugs from a 340B entity.
77 (vii) Require or compel the submission of ingredient costs or pricing data pertaining to
78 340B drugs to any health insurance issuer, pharmacy benefit manager, or other third-party payor.
79 (viii) Exclude any 340B entity from the health insurance issuer, pharmacy benefit
80 manager, or other third party payor network on the basis that the 340B entity dispenses drugs
81 subject to an agreement under 42 U.S.C.256b, or refusing to contract with a 340B entity for
82 reasons other than those that apply equally to non-340B entities.
83 (ix) Nothing in this section applies to the division of medical assistance as payor when
84 Medicaid provides reimbursement for covered outpatient drugs as defined in 42 U.S.C. 1396r-
85 8(9k)).
86 (c) With respect to manufacturing or distribution of drugs related to 340B entities:
87 (i) A manufacturer or distributor shall not deny, restrict, prohibit, or otherwise interfere
88 with, either directly or indirectly, the acquisition of a 340B drug by, or delivery of a 340B drug
89 to, a pharmacy that is under contract with a 340B entity and is authorized under such contract to
90 receive and dispense 340B drugs on behalf of the covered entity unless such receipt is prohibited
91 by the United States Department of Health and Human Services.
92 (ii) A manufacturer or distributor shall not interfere with a pharmacy contracted with a
93 340B entity.
5 of 30

94 (iii) A manufacturer or distributor shall not require a 340B entity to submit any claims,
95 utilization, patient, or other data as a condition for allowing the acquisition of a 340B drug by, or
96 delivery of a 340B drug to, a
97 340B entity unless the data is required by the United States Department of Health and
98 Human Services.
99 SECTION XX. Chapter 175 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official
100 Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after section 47TT, the following new section:-
101 Section 47UU.
102 (a) For purposes of this section:
103 (1) “340B drug” shall mean a drug that has been subject to any offer for reduced prices
104 by a manufacturer pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 256b and is purchased by a covered entity as defined by
105 42 U.S.C. 256b(a)(4).
106 (2) “340B entity” shall mean an entity participating or authorized to participate in the
107 federal 340B drug discount program, as defined by 42 U.S.C. 256b, including its pharmacy, or
108 any pharmacy contracted with the participating entity to dispense drugs purchased through the
109 340B drug discount program.
110 (3) “Health insurance issuer” shall mean “carrier” as defined in section 1 of chapter
111 176O.
112 (4) “Third party” shall mean a group health plan, a health insurance issuer offering group
113 or individual health insurance coverage, or a pharmacy benefit manager that reimburses a 340B
114 covered entity for drugs. Third party includes Medicaid managed care organizations, employee
6 of 30

115 benefit plans under the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, or Medicare Part C
116 or D plans. Third party does not include drugs reimbursed under Medicaid fee-for-service or a
117 self-pay patient.
118 (5) “Manufacturer” means a person who is engaged in manufacturing, preparing,
119 propagating, compounding, processing, packaging, repackaging or labeling a prescription drug as
120 defined in 247 CMR 2.00.
121 (6) “Pharmacy” incudes the definition of “pharmacy” and “retail drug business” as
122 defined by section 1 of chapter 94C, and “Institutional pharmacy” as defined by section 39D of
123 chapter 112.
124 (7) “Pharmacy benefit manager” shall have the same meaning as defined by section 226
125 of chapter 175.
126 (b) With respect to reimbursement to a 340B entity for 340B drugs, a health insurance
127 issuer, pharmacy benefit manager, other third party payor, or their agents shall not do any of the
128 following:
129 (i) Reimburse a 340B entity for 340B drugs at a rate lower than that paid for the same
130 drug to entities that are not 340B entities or lower reimbursement for a claim on the basis that the
131 claim is for a 340B drug.
132 (ii) Impose any terms or conditions on any 340B entity with respect to any of the
133 following that differ from such terms or conditions applied to non-340B entities on the basis that
134 the entity participates in the federal 340B drug discount program set forth in 42 U.S.C.256b or
135 that a drug is a 340B drug including, without limitation, any of the following:
7 of 30

136 A. Fees, charges, clawbacks, or other adjustments or assessments. For purposes of this
137 Subsection, the term “other adjustment” includes placing any additional requirements,
138 restrictions, or unnecessary burdens upon the 340B entity that results in administrative costs or
139 fees to the 340B entity that are not placed upon other entities that do not participate in the 340B
140 drug discount program, including affiliate pharmacies of the health insurance issuer, pharmacy
141 benefit manager, or other third-party payor.
142 B. Dispensing fees that are less than the dispensing fees for non-340B entities.
143 C. Restrictions or requirements regarding participation in standard or preferred pharmacy
144 networks.
145 D. Restrictions or requirements regarding participation in standard or preferred pharmacy
146 network.
147 E. Requirements that a claim for a drug include any identification, billing modifier,
148 attestation, or other indication that a drug is a 340B drug in order to be processed or resubmitted
149 unless it is required by the United States Department of Health and Human Services, Centers for
150 Medicare and Medicaid Services, the executive office of health and human services, or the
151 division of medical assistance.
152 F. Any other restrictions, conditions, practices, or policies that are not imposed on non-
153 340B entities.
154 (iii) Require a 340B entity to reverse, resubmit, or clarify a claim after the initial
155 adjudication unless these actions are in the normal course of pharmacy business and not related
156 to 340B drug pricing.
8 of 30

157 (iv) Discriminate against a 340B entity in a manner that prevents or interferes with any
158 patient’s choice to receive such drugs from the 340B entity, including the administration of such
159 drugs. For purposes of this subsection, it is considered a discriminatory practice that prevents or
160 interferes with a patient’s choice to receive drugs at a 340B entity if a health insurance issuer,
161 pharmacy benefit manager, or other third-party payor places any additional requirements,
162 restrictions, or unnecessary burdens upon the 340B entity that results in administrative costs or
163 fees to the 340B entity, including but not limited to requiring a claim for a drug to include any
164 identification, billing modifier, attestation or other indication that a drug is a 340B drug in order
165 to be processed or resubmitted unless it is required by the United States Department of Health
166 and Human Services, Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, the executive office of health
167 and human services, or the division of medical assistance.
168 (v) Require a 340B entity to submit any claims, utilization, patient, or other data as a
169 condition for allowing the acquisition of a 340B drug by, or delivery of a 340B drug to, a 340B
170 entity unless the data is required by the United States Department of Health and Human Services,
171 Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, the executive office of health and human services,
172 or the division of medical assistance.
173 (vi) Include any other provision in a contract between a health insurance issuer, pharmacy
174 benefit manager, or other third-party payor and a 340B entity that discriminates against the 340B
175 entity or prevents or interferes with an individual’s choice to receive a prescription drug from a
176 340B entity, including the administration of the drug, in person or via direct delivery, mail, or
177 other form of shipment, or creation of a restriction or additional charge on a patient who chooses
178 to receive drugs from a 340B entity.
9 of 30

179 (vii) Require or compel the submission of ingredient costs or pricing data pertaining to
180 340B drugs to any health insurance issuer, pharmacy benefit manager, or other third party payor.
181 (viii) Exclude any 340B entity from the health insurance issuer, pharmacy benefit
182 manager, or other third party payor network on the basis that the 340B entity dispenses drugs
183 subject to an agreement under 42 U.S.C.256b, or refusing to contract with a 340B entity for
184 reasons other than those that apply equally to non-340B entities.
185 (ix) Nothing in this section applies to the division of medical assistance as payor when
186 Medicaid provides reimbursement for covered outpatient drugs as defined in 42 U.S.C. 1396r-
187 8(9k)).
188 (c) With respect to manufacturing or distribution of drugs related to 340B entities:
189 (i) A manufacturer or distributor shall not deny, restrict, prohibit, or otherwise interfere
190 with, either directly or indirectly, the acquisition of a 340B drug by, or delivery of a 340B drug
191 to, a pharmacy that is under contract with a 340B entity and is authorized under such contract to
192 receive and dispense 340B drugs on behalf of the covered entity unless such receipt is prohibited
193 by the United States Department of Health and Human Services.
194 (ii) A manufacturer or distributor shall not interfere with a pharmacy contracted with a
195 340B entity.
196 (iii) A manufacturer or distributor shall not require a 340B entity to submit any claims,
197 utilization, patient, or other data as a condition for allowing the acquisition of a 340B drug by, or
198 delivery of a 340B drug to, a 340B entity unless the data is required by the United States
199 Department of Health and Human Services.
10 of 30

200 SECTION XX. Chapter 176A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official
201 Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after section 39, the following new section:-
202 Section 40.
203 (a) For purposes of this section:
204 (1) “340B drug” shall mean a drug that has been subject to any offer for reduced prices
205 by a manufacturer pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 256b and is purchased by a covered entity as defined by
206 42 U.S.C. 256b(a)(4).
207 (2) “340B entity” shall mean an entity participating or authorized to participate in the
208 federal 340B drug discount program, as defined by 42 U.S.C. 256b, including its pharmacy, or
209 any pharmacy contracted with the participating entity to dispense drugs purchased through the
210 340B drug discount program.
211 (3) “Health insurance issuer” shall mean “carrier” as defined in section 1 of chapter
212 176O.
213 (4) “Third party” shall mean a group health plan, a health insurance issuer offering group
214 or individual health insurance coverage, or a pharmacy benefit manager that reimburses a 340B
215 covered entity for drugs. Third party includes Medicaid managed care organizations, employee
216 benefit plans under the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, or Medicare Part C
217 or D plans. Third party does not include drugs reimbursed under Medicaid fee-for-service or a
218 self-pay patient.
11 of 30

219 (5) “Manufacturer” means a person who is engaged in manufacturing, preparing,
220 propagating, compounding, processing, packaging, repackaging or labeling a prescription drug as
221 defined in 247 CMR 2.00.
222 (6) “Pharmacy” incudes the definition of “pharmacy” and “retail drug business” as
223 defined by section 1 of chapter 94C, and “Institutional pharmacy” as defined by section 39D of
224 chapter 112.
225 (7) “Pharmacy benefit manager” shall have the same meaning as defined by section 226
226 of chapter 175.
227 (b) With respect to reimbursement to a 340B entity for 340B drugs, a health insurance
228 issuer, pharmacy benefit manager, other third party payor, or their agents shall not do any of the
229 following:
230 (i) Reimburse a 340B entity for 340B drugs at a rate lower than that paid for the same
231 drug to entities that are not 340B entities or lower reimbursement for a claim on the basis that the
232 claim is for a 340B drug.
233 (ii) Impose any terms or conditions on any 340B entity with respect to any of the
234 following that differ from such terms or conditions applied to non-340B entities on the basis that
235 the entity participates in the federal 340B drug discount program set forth in 42 U.S.C.256b or
236 that a drug is a 340B drug including, without limitation, any of the following:
237 A. Fees, charges, clawbacks, or other adjustments or assessments. For purposes of this
238 Subsection, the term “other adjustment” includes placing any additional requirements,
239 restrictions, or unnecessary burdens upon the 340B entity that results in administrative costs or
12 of 30

240 fees to the 340B entity that are not placed upon other entities that do not participate in the 340B
241 drug discount program, including affiliate pharmacies of the health insurance issuer, pharmacy
242 benefit manager, or other third-party payor.
243 B. Dispensing fees that are less than the dispensing fees for non-340B entities.
244 C. Restrictions or requirements regarding participation in standard or preferred pharmacy
245 networks.
246 D. Restrictions or requirements regarding participation in standard or preferred pharmacy
247 network.
248 E. Requirements that a claim for a drug include any identification, billing modifier,
249 attestation, or other indication that a drug is a 340B drug in order to be processed or resubmitted
250 unless it is required by the United States Department of Health and Human Services, Centers for
251 Medicare and Medicaid Services, the executive office of health and human services, or the
252 division of medical assistance.
253 F. Any other restrictions, conditions, practices, or policies that are not imposed on non-
254 340B entities.
255 (iii) Require a 340B entity to reverse, resubmit, or clarify a claim after the initial
256 adjudication unless these actions are in the normal course of pharmacy business and not related
257 to 340B drug pricing.
258 (iv) Discriminate against a 340B entity in a manner that prevents or interferes with any
259 patient’s choice to receive such drugs from the 340B entity, including the administration of such
260 drugs. For purposes of this subsection, it is considered a discriminatory practice that prevents or
13 of 30

261 interferes with a patient’s choice to receive drugs at a 340B entity if a health insurance issuer,
262 pharmacy benefit manager, or other third-party payor places any additional requirements,
263 restrictions, or unnecessary burdens upon the 340B entity that results in administrative costs or
264 fees to the 340B entity, including but not limited to requiring a claim for a drug to include any
265 identification, billing modifier, attestation or other indication that a drug is a 340B drug in order
266 to be processed or resubmitted unless it is required by the United States Department of Health
267 and Human Services, Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, the executive office of health
268 and human services, or the division of medical assistance.
269 (v) Require a 340B entity to submit any claims, utilization, patient, or other data as a
270 condition for allowing the acquisition of a 340B drug by, or delivery of a 340B drug to, a 340B
271 entity unless the data is required by the United States Department of Health and Human Services,
272 Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, the executive office of health and human services,
273 or the division of medical assistance.
274 (vi) Include any other provision in a contract between a health insurance issuer, pharmacy
275 benefit manager, or other third-party payor and a 340B entity that discriminates against the 340B
276 entity or prevents or interferes with an individual’s choice to receive a prescription drug from a
277 340B entity, including the administration of the drug, in person or via direct delivery, mail, or
278 other form of shipment, or creation of a restriction or additional charge on a patient who chooses
279 to receive drugs from a 340B entity.
280 (vii) Require or compel the submission of ingredient costs or pricing data pertaining to
281 340B drugs to any health insurance issuer, pharmacy benefit manager, or other third party payor.
14 of 30

282 (viii) Exclude any 340B entity from the health insurance issuer, pharmacy benefit
283 manager, or other third party payor network on the basis that the 340B entity dispenses drugs
284 subject to an agreement under 42 U.S.C.256b, or refusing to contract with a 340B entity for
285 reasons other than those that apply equally to non-340B entities.
286 (ix) Nothing in this section applies to the division of medical assistance as payor when
287 Medicaid provides reimbursement for covered outpatient drugs as defined in 42 U.S.C. 1396r-
288 8(9k)).
289 (c) With respect to manufacturing or distribution of drugs related to 340B entities:
290 (i) A manufacturer or distributor shall not deny, restrict, prohibit, or otherwise interfere
291 with, either directly or indirectly, the acquisition of a 340B drug by, or delivery of a 340B drug
292 to, a pharmacy that is under contract with a 340B entity and is authorized under such contract to
293 receive and dispense 340B drugs on behalf of the covered entity unless such receipt is prohibited
294 by the United States Department of Health and Human Services.
295 (ii) A manufacturer or distributor shall not interfere with a pharmacy contracted with a
296 340B entity.
297 (iii) A manufacturer or distributor shall not require a 340B entity to submit any claims,
298 utilization, patient, or other data as a condition for allowing the acquisition of a 340B drug by, or
299 delivery of a 340B drug to, a 340B entity unless the data is required by the United States
300 Department of Health and Human Services.
301 SECTION XX. Chapter 176B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official
302 Edition, is hereby further amended by inserting after section 26 the following new section: -
15 of 30

303 Section 27.
304 (a) For purposes of this section:
305 (1) “340B drug” shall mean a drug that has been subject to any offer for reduced prices
306 by a manufacturer pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 256b and is purchased by a covered entity as defined by
307 42 U.S.C. 256b(a)(4).
308 (2) “340B entity” shall mean an entity participating or authorized to participate in the
309 federal 340B drug discount program, as defined by 42 U.S.C. 256b, including its pharmacy, or
310 any pharmacy contracted with the participating entity to dispense drugs purchased through the
311 340B drug discount program.
312 (3) “Health insurance issuer” shall mean “carrier” as defined in section 1 of chapter
313 176O.
314 (4) “Third party” shall mean a group health plan, a health insurance issuer offering group
315 or individual health insurance coverage, or a pharmacy benefit manager that reimburses a 340B
316 covered entity for drugs. Third party includes Medicaid managed care organizations, employee
317 benefit plans under the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, or Medicare Part C
318 or D plans. Third party does not include drugs reimbursed under Medicaid fee-for-service or a
319 self-pay patient.
320 (5) “Manufacturer” means a person who is engaged in manufacturing, preparing,
321 propagating, compounding, processing, packaging, repackaging or labeling a prescription drug as
322 defined in 247 CMR 2.00.
16 of 30

323 (6) “Pharmacy” incudes the definition of “pharmacy” and “retail drug business” as
324 defined by section 1 of chapter 94C, and “Institutional pharmacy” as defined by section 39D of
325 chapter 112.
326 (7) “Pharmacy benefit manager” shall have the same meaning as defined by section 226
327 of chapter 175.
328 (b) With respect to reimbursement to a 340B entity for 340B drugs, a health insurance
329 issuer, pharmacy benefit manager, other third party payor, or their agents shall not do any of the
330 following:
331 (i) Reimburse a 340B entity for 340B drugs at a rate lower than that paid for the same
332 drug to entities that are not 340B entities or lower reimbursement for a claim on the basis that the
333 claim is for a 340B drug.
334 (ii) Impose any terms or conditions on any 340B entity with respect to any of the
335 following that differ from such terms or conditions applied to non-340B entities on the basis that
336 the entity participates in the federal 340B drug discount program set forth in 42 U.S.C.256b or
337 that a drug is a 340B drug including, without limitation, any of the following:
338 A. Fees, charges, clawbacks, or other adjustments or assessments. For purposes of this
339 Subsection, the term “other adjustment” includes placing any additional requirements,
340 restrictions, or unnecessary burdens upon the 340B entity that results in administrative costs or
341 fees to the 340B entity that are not placed upon other entities that do not participate in the 340B
342 drug discount program, including affiliate pharmacies of the health insurance issuer, pharmacy
343 benefit manager, or other third-party payor.
17 of 30

344 B. Dispensing fees that are less than the dispensing fees for non-340B entities.
345 C. Restrictions or requirements regarding participation in standard or preferred pharmacy
346 networks.
347 D. Restrictions or requirements regarding participation in standard or preferred pharmacy
348 network.
349 E. Requirements that a claim for a drug include any identification, billing modifier,
350 attestation, or other indication that a drug is a 340B drug in order to be processed or resubmitted
351 unless it is required by the United States Department of Health and Human Services, Centers for
352 Medicare and Medicaid Services, the executive office of health and human services, or the
353 division of medical assistance.
354 F. Any other restrictions, conditions, practices, or policies that are not imposed on non-
355 340B entities.
356 (iii) Require a 340B entity to reverse, resubmit, or clarify a claim after the initial
357 adjudication unless these actions are in the normal course of pharmacy business and not related
358 to 340B drug pricing.
359 (iv) Discriminate against a 340B entity in a manner that prevents or interferes with any
360 patient’s choice to receive such drugs from the 340B entity, including the administration of such
361 drugs. For purposes of this subsection, it is considered a discriminatory practice that prevents or
362 interferes with a patient’s choice to receive drugs at a 340B entity if a health insurance issuer,
363 pharmacy benefit manager, or other third-party payor places any additional requirements,
364 restrictions, or unnecessary burdens upon the 340B entity that results in administrative costs or
18 of 30

365 fees to the 340B entity, including but not limited to requiring a claim for a drug to include any
366 identification, billing modifier, attestation or other indication that a drug is a 340B drug in order
367 to be processed or resubmitted unless it is required by the United States Department of Health
368 and Human Services, Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, the executive office of health
369 and human services, or the division of medical assistance.
370 (v) Require a 340B entity to submit any claims, utilization, patient, or other data as a
371 condition for allowing the acquisition of a 340B drug by, or delivery of a 340B drug to, a 340B
372 entity unless the data is required by the United States Department of Health and Human Services,
373 Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, the executive office of health and human services,
374 or the division of medical assistance.
375 (vi) Include any other provision in a contract between a health insurance issuer, pharmacy
376 benefit manager, or other third-party payor and a 340B entity that discriminates against the 340B
377 entity or prevents or interferes with an individual’s choice to receive a prescription drug from a
378 340B entity, including the administration of the drug, in person or via direct delivery, mail, or
379 other form of shipment, or creation of a restriction or additional charge on a patient who chooses
380 to receive drugs from a 340B entity.
381 (vii) Require or compel the submission of ingredient costs or pricing data pertaining to
382 340B drugs to any health insurance issuer, pharmacy benefit manager, or other third party payor.
383 (viii) Exclude any 340B entity from the health insurance issuer, pharmacy benefit
384 manager, or other third party payor network on the basis that the 340B entity dispenses drugs
385 subject to an agreement under 42 U.S.C.256b, or refusing to contract with a 340B entity for
386 reasons other than those that apply equally to non-340B entities.
19 of 30

387 (ix) Nothing in this section applies to the division of medical assistance as payor when
388 Medicaid provides reimbursement for covered outpatient drugs as defined in 42 U.S.C. 1396r-
389 8(9k)).
390 (c) With respect to manufacturing or distribution of drugs related to 340B entities:
391 (i) A manufacturer or distributor shall not deny, restrict, prohibit, or otherwise interfere
392 with, either directly or indirectly, the acquisition of a 340B drug by, or delivery of a 340B drug
393 to, a pharmacy that is under contract with a 340B entity and is authorized under such contract to
394 receive and dispense 340B drugs on behalf of the covered entity unless such receipt is prohibited
395 by the United States Department of Health and Human Services.
396 (ii) A manufacturer or distributor shall not interfere with a pharmacy contracted with a
397 340B entity.
398 (iii) A manufacturer or distributor shall not require a 340B entity to submit any claims,
399 utilization, patient, or other data as a condition for allowing the acquisition of a 340B drug by, or
400 delivery of a 340B drug to, a 340B entity unless the data is required by the United States
401 Department of Health and Human Services.
402 SECTION XX. Chapter 176G of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official
403 Edition, is hereby further amended by inserting after section 34 the following new section:-
404 Section 35.
405 (a) For purposes of this section:
20 of 30

406 (1) “340B drug” shall mean a drug that has been subject to any offer for reduced prices
407 by a manufacturer pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 256b and is purchased by a covered entity as defined by
408 42 U.S.C. 256b(a)(4).
409 (2) “340B entity” shall mean an entity participating or authorized to participate in the
410 federal 340B drug discount program, as defined by 42 U.S.C. 256b, including its pharmacy, or
411 any pharmacy contracted with the participating entity to dispense drugs purchased through the
412 340B drug discount program.
413 (3) “Health insurance issuer” shall mean “carrier” as defined in section 1 of chapter
414 176O.
415 (4) “Third party” shall mean a group health plan, a health insurance issuer offering group
416 or individual health insurance coverage, or a pharmacy benefit manager that reimburses a 340B
417 covered entity for drugs. Third party includes Medicaid managed care organizations, employee
418 benefit plans under the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, or Medicare Part C
419 or D plans. Third party does not include drugs reimbursed under Medicaid fee-for-service or a
420 self-pay patient.
421 (5) “Manufacturer” means a person who is engaged in manufacturing, preparing,
422 propagating, compounding, processing, packaging, repackaging or labeling a prescription drug as
423 defined in 247 CMR 2.00.
424 (6) “Pharmacy” incudes the definition of “pharmacy” and “retail drug business” as
425 defined by section 1 of chapter 94C, and “Institutional pharmacy” as defined by section 39D of
426 chapter 112.
21 of 30

427 (7) “Pharmacy benefit manager” shall have the same meaning as defined by section 226
428 of chapter 175.
429 (b) With respect to reimbursement to a 340B entity for 340B drugs, a health insurance
430 issuer, pharmacy benefit manager, other third party payor, or their agents shall not do any of the
431 following:
432 (i)Reimburse a 340B entity for 340B drugs at a rate lower than that paid for the same
433 drug to entities that are not 340B entities or lower reimbursement for a claim on the basis that the
434 claim is for a 340B drug.
435 (ii) Impose any terms or conditions on any 340B entity with respect to any of the
436 following that differ from such terms or conditions applied to non-340B entities on the basis that
437 the entity participates in the federal 340B drug discount program set forth in 42 U.S.C.256b or
438 that a drug is a 340B drug including, without limitation, any of the following:
439 A. Fees, charges, clawbacks, or other adjustments or assessments. For purposes of this
440 Subsection, the term “other adjustment” includes placing any additional requirements,
441 restrictions, or unnecessary burdens upon the 340B entity that results in administrative costs or
442 fees to the 340B entity that are not placed upon other entities that do not participate in the 340B
443 drug discount program, including affiliate pharmacies of the health insurance issuer, pharmacy
444 benefit manager, or other third-party payor.
445 B. Dispensing fees that are less than the dispensing fees for non-340B entities.
446 C. Restrictions or requirements regarding participation in standard or preferred pharmacy
447 networks.
22 of 30

448 D. Restrictions or requirements regarding participation in standard or preferred pharmacy
449 network.
450 E. Requirements that a claim for a drug include any identification, billing modifier,
451 attestation, or other indication that a drug is a 340B drug in order to be processed or resubmitted
452 unless it is required by the United States Department of Health and Human Services, Centers for
453 Medicare and Medicaid Services, the executive office of health and human services, or the
454 division of medical assistance.
455 F. Any other restrictions, conditions, practices, or policies that are not imposed on non-
456 340B entities.
457 (iii) Require a 340B entity to reverse, resubmit, or clarify a claim after the initial
458 adjudication unless these actions are in the normal course of pharmacy business and not related
459 to 340B drug pricing.
460 (iv) Discriminate against a 340B entity in a manner that prevents or interferes with any
461 patient’s choice to receive such drugs from the 340B entity, including the administration of such
462 drugs. For purposes of this subsection, it is considered a discriminatory practice that prevents or
463 interferes with a patient’s choice to receive drugs at a 340B entity if a health insurance issuer,
464 pharmacy benefit manager, or other third-party payor places any additional requirements,
465 restrictions, or unnecessary burdens upon the 340B entity that results in administrative costs or
466 fees to the 340B entity, including but not limited to requiring a claim for a drug to include any
467 identification, billing modifier, attestation or other indication that a drug is a 340B drug in order
468 to be processed or resubmitted unless it is required by the United States Department of Health
23 of 30

469 and Human Services, Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, the executive office of health
470 and human services, or the division of medical assistance.
471 (v) Require a 340B entity to submit any claims, utilization, patient, or other data as a
472 condition for allowing the acquisition of a 340B drug by, or delivery of a 340B drug to, a 340B
473 entity unless the data is required by the United States Department of Health and Human Services,
474 Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, the executive office of health and human services,
475 or the division of medical assistance.
476 (vi) Include any other provision in a contract between a health insurance issuer, pharmacy
477 benefit manager, or other third-party payor and a 340B entity that discriminates against the 340B
478 entity or prevents or interferes with an individual’s choice to receive a prescription drug from a
479 340B entity, including the administration of the drug, in person or via direct delivery, mail, or
480 other form of shipment, or creation of a restriction or additional charge on a patient who chooses
481 to receive drugs from a 340B entity.
482 (vii) Require or compel the submission of ingredient costs or pricing data pertaining to
483 340B drugs to any health insurance issuer, pharmacy benefit manager, or other third party payor.
484 (viii) Exclude any 340B entity from the health insurance issuer, pharmacy benefit
485 manager, or other third party payor network on the basis that the 340B entity dispenses drugs
486 subject to an agreement under 42 U.S.C.256b, or refusing to contract with a 340B entity for
487 reasons other than those that apply equally to non-340B entities.
488 (ix) Nothing in this section applies to the division of medical assistance as payor when
489 Medicaid provides reimbursement for covered outpatient drugs as defined in 42 U.S.C. 1396r-
490 8(9k)).
24 of 30

491 (c) With respect to manufacturing or distribution of drugs related to 340B entities:
492 (i) A manufacturer or distributor shall not deny, restrict, prohibit, or otherwise interfere
493 with, either directly or indirectly, the acquisition of a 340B drug by, or delivery of a 340B drug
494 to, a pharmacy that is under contract with a 340B entity and is authorized under such contract to
495 receive and dispense 340B drugs on behalf of the covered entity unless such receipt is prohibited
496 by the United States Department of Health and Human Services.
497 (ii) A manufacturer or distributor shall not interfere with a pharmacy contracted with a
498 340B entity.
499 (iii) A manufacturer or distributor shall not require a 340B entity to submit any claims,
500 utilization, patient, or other data as a condition for allowing the acquisition of a 340B drug by, or
501 delivery of a 340B drug to, a 340B entity unless the data is required by the United States
502 Department of Health and Human Services.
503 SECTION XX. Chapter 176I of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official
504 Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after section 14 the following new section: -
505 Section 15.
506 (a) For purposes of this section:
507 (1) “340B drug” shall mean a drug that has been subject to any offer for reduced prices
508 by a manufacturer pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 256b and is purchased by a covered entity as defined by
509 42 U.S.C. 256b(a)(4).
510 (2) “340B entity” shall mean an entity participating or authorized to participate in the
511 federal 340B drug discount program, as defined by 42 U.S.C. 256b, including its pharmacy, or
25 of 30

512 any pharmacy contracted with the participating entity to dispense drugs purchased through the
513 340B drug discount program.
514 (3) “Health insurance issuer” shall mean “carrier” as defined in section 1 of chapter
515 176O.
516 (4) “Third party” shall mean a group health plan, a health insurance issuer offering group
517 or individual health insurance coverage, or a pharmacy benefit manager that reimburses a 340B
518 covered entity for drugs. Third party includes Medicaid managed care organizations, employee
519 benefit plans under the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, or Medicare Part C
520 or D plans. Third party does not include drugs reimbursed under Medicaid fee-for-service or a
521 self-pay patient.
522 (5) “Manufacturer” means a person who is engaged in manufacturing, preparing,
523 propagating, compounding, processing, packaging, repackaging or labeling a prescription drug as
524 defined in 247 CMR 2.00.
525 (6) “Pharmacy” incudes the definition of “pharmacy” and “retail drug business” as
526 defined by section 1 of chapter 94C, and “Institutional pharmacy” as defined by section 39D of
527 chapter 112.
528 (7) “Pharmacy benefit manager” shall have the same meaning as defined by section 226
529 of chapter 175.
530 (b) With respect to reimbursement to a 340B entity for 340B drugs, a health insurance
531 issuer, pharmacy benefit manager, other third party payor, or their agents shall not do any of the
532 following:
26 of 30

533 (i) Reimburse a 340B entity for 340B drugs at a rate lower than that paid for the same
534 drug to entities that are not 340B entities or lower reimbursement for a claim on the basis that the
535 claim is for a 340B drug.
536 (ii) Impose any terms or conditions on any 340B entity with respect to any of the
537 following that differ from such terms or conditions applied to non-340B entities on the basis that
538 the entity participates in the federal 340B drug discount program set forth in 42 U.S.C.256b or
539 that a drug is a 340B drug including, without limitation, any of the following:
540 A. Fees, charges, clawbacks, or other adjustments or assessments. For purposes of this
541 Subsection, the term “other adjustment” includes placing any additional requirements,
542 restrictions, or unnecessary burdens upon the 340B entity that results in administrative costs or
543 fees to the 340B entity that are not placed upon other entities that do not participate in the 340B
544 drug discount program, including affiliate pharmacies of the health insurance issuer, pharmacy
545 benefit manager, or other third-party payor.
546 B. Dispensing fees that are less than the dispensing fees for non-340B entities.
547 C. Restrictions or requirements regarding participation in standard or preferred pharmacy
548 networks.
549 D. Restrictions or requirements regarding participation in standard or preferred pharmacy
550 network.
551 E. Requirements that a claim for a drug include any identification, billing modifier,
552 attestation, or other indication that a drug is a 340B drug in order to be processed or resubmitted
553 unless it is required by the United States Department of Health and Human Services, Centers for
27 of 30

554 Medicare and Medicaid Services, the executive office of health and human services, or the
555 division of medical assistance.
556 F. Any other restrictions, conditions, practices, or policies that are not imposed on non-
557 340B entities.
558 (iii) Require a 340B entity to reverse, resubmit, or clarify a claim after the initial
559 adjudication unless these actions are in the normal course of pharmacy business and not related
560 to 340B drug pricing.
561 (iv) Discriminate against a 340B entity in a manner that prevents or interferes with any
562 patient’s choice to receive such drugs from the 340B entity, including the administration of such
563 drugs. For purposes of this subsection, it is considered a discriminatory practice that prevents or
564 interferes with a patient’s choice to receive drugs at a 340B entity if a health insurance issuer,
565 pharmacy benefit manager, or other third-party payor places any additional requirements,
566 restrictions, or unnecessary burdens upon the 340B entity that results in administrative costs or
567 fees to the 340B entity, including but not limited to requiring a claim for a drug to include any
568 identification, billing modifier, attestation or other indication that a drug is a 340B drug in order
569 to be processed or resubmitted unless it is required by the United States Department of Health
570 and Human Services, Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, the executive office of health
571 and human services, or the division of medical assistance.
572 (v) Require a 340B entity to submit any claims, utilization, patient, or other data as a
573 condition for allowing the acquisition of a 340B drug by, or delivery of a 340B drug to, a 340B
574 entity unless the data is required by the United States Department of Health and Human Services,
28 of 30

575 Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, the executive office of health and human services,
576 or the division of medical assistance.
577 (vi) Include any other provision in a contract between a health insurance issuer, pharmacy
578 benefit manager, or other third-party payor and a 340B entity that discriminates against the 340B
579 entity or prevents or interferes with an individual’s choice to receive a prescription drug from a
580 340B entity, including the administration of the drug, in person or via direct delivery, mail, or
581 other form of shipment, or creation of a restriction or additional charge on a patient who chooses
582 to receive drugs from a 340B entity.
583 (vii) Require or compel the submission of ingredient costs or pricing data pertaining to
584 340B drugs to any health insurance issuer, pharmacy benefit manager, or other third party payor.
585 (viii) Exclude any 340B entity from the health insurance issuer, pharmacy benefit
586 manager, or other third party payor network on the basis that the 340B entity dispenses drugs
587 subject to an agreement under 42 U.S.C.256b, or refusing to contract with a 340B entity for
588 reasons other than those that apply equally to non-340B entities.
589 (ix) Nothing in this section applies to the division of medical assistance as payor when
590 Medicaid provides reimbursement for covered outpatient drugs as defined in 42 U.S.C. 1396r-
591 8(9k)).
592 (c) With respect to manufacturing or distribution of drugs related to 340B entities:
593 (i) A manufacturer or distributor shall not deny, restrict, prohibit, or otherwise interfere
594 with, either directly or indirectly, the acquisition of a 340B drug by, or delivery of a 340B drug
595 to, a pharmacy that is under contract with a 340B entity and is authorized under such contract to
29 of 30

596 receive and dispense 340B drugs on behalf of the covered entity unless such receipt is prohibited
597 by the United States Department of Health and Human Services.
598 (ii) A manufacturer or distributor shall not interfere with a pharmacy contracted with a
599 340B entity.
600 (iii) A manufacturer or distributor shall not require a 340B entity to submit any claims,
601 utilization, patient, or other data as a condition for allowing the acquisition of a 340B drug by, or
602 delivery of a 340B drug to, a 340B entity unless the data is required by the United States
603 Department of Health and Human Services.
30 of 30